District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.14

Extent of land bound by lien.

If there be any contest as to the dimensions of the land claimed to be subjected to the lien aforesaid, the court shall determine the same upon the evidence and describe the same in the decree of sale.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1387, ch. 854, § 1252
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-31, § 2(h), 52 DCR 7195
1981 Ed., § 38-116.
1973 Ed., § 38-116.
D.C. Law 16-31 substituted “land” for “ground”.